Utah statutes.
59-2-1003 (Superseded 01/01/13).   Power of county board to increase or decrease assessment.

The county board of equalization may, after giving notice as prescribed by rule, increase or decrease any assessment contained in any assessment book, so as to equalize the assessment of all classes of property under Section 59-2-103.

